West Virginia, session 2026, HB4846.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6J. SPECIAL METHOD FOR VALUATION OF CERTAIN HIGH-TECHNOLOGY PROPERTY. §11-6J-3. Valuation of certain specialized high-technology property. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, the value of servers directly used in a high-technology business or in an Internet advertising business, as defined in §11-15-9h of this code, and the value of tangible personal property directly used in a high-technology business or in an Internet advertising business, as defined in said section, for the purpose of ad valorem property taxation under this chapter and under article X of the Constitution of this state, shall be its salvage value. This section shall only apply for servers or tangible personal property holding a valuation of over $100 million.